Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 9
FAMILY STRENGTHENING HOME VISITING PROGRAMS

26.5-3-901. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Traditional methods of delivering family-strengthening service programs, which often require parents and their children to travel to a program site to access services delivered simultaneously to multiple families, often create barriers, such as limited access to transportation or creation of a stigma around receiving services, that prevent families, especially low-income families, from receiving the benefits of the services;

Evidence demonstrates that voluntary, high-quality, evidence-based programs that deliver family-strengthening support services help parents and other caregivers develop the skills and confidence needed to promote their children's healthy development and learning;

Home visiting is a service delivery strategy that is successfully used to deliver a wide array of high-quality, voluntary family-strengthening support services and that enables families to overcome barriers to access because the services are delivered in the home or other convenient settings, which are often selected by the family;

Home visiting is a service delivery strategy that can be leveraged to provide high-quality, voluntary, family-strengthening support services to more Colorado families who have fewer resources and are exposed to risk factors that may lead to poor outcomes in child development. Using home visiting to provide these services results in a strong return on investment by improving school readiness and helping Colorado's children reach their full potential.

Family-strengthening support services that are delivered through home visiting have also demonstrated improved family and child outcomes by promoting solid parent-child relationships, improving child and parental social-emotional and physical health, improving family economic security, identifying developmental delays early, providing timely child welfare intervention services, and preventing trauma and toxic stress.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that authorizing grant programs to support home visiting programs that deliver high-quality, voluntary, family-strengthening support services is one of the best strategies available to support parents and other caregivers in preparing children for future success and ensure all Colorado children are ready to learn when they arrive at school.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 657, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-3-902. Definition.

As used in this part 9, unless the context otherwise requires, "home visiting" means a two-generation delivery strategy that is designed to overcome barriers to accessing services by providing a comprehensive array of voluntary, evidence-based, family-strengthening services to a family in a location usually selected by the family that is congruent with the services being provided, which location may include, but need not be limited to, the family's home, a health-care setting, or a family resource center.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 658, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-3-903. Family-strengthening grant programs - authorized requirements - implementation partner - rules.

The department is authorized to operate grant programs to support local providers in delivering high-quality, voluntary, family-strengthening support services using home visiting strategies that are designed to overcome the access barriers often created by traditional delivery strategies. The executive director may promulgate rules as necessary to implement grant programs as authorized in this section.

Any grant programs that the department operates pursuant to this section must be designed to award grants to family support services providers that provide a continuum of high-quality, voluntary, family-strengthening support services that:

Serve families at some point during the period that extends from pregnancy through the child's enrollment in early elementary school grades;

Are evidence-based and have demonstrated significant positive outcomes in one or more of the following areas:

Child development and school readiness;

Family economic self-sufficiency;

Maternal and child health;

Reductions in child maltreatment;

Family linkages and referrals to resources; and

Positive parenting practices; and

Are delivered using a home visiting strategy to provide family services that is based on a national model for home visiting services or has been otherwise proven effective in overcoming barriers to accessing services.

In implementing a family-strengthening grant program pursuant to this section, the department shall contract with an implementation partner. If a grant program is based on a national model for delivering family-strengthening services, the department shall contract with a local public or private entity that is certified, or otherwise authorized, to lead in implementing the national model in the state, to act as the implementation partner. If a grant program is not based on a national model, the department shall issue a request for proposals to select an implementation partner. The public or private entity that the department selects must, at a minimum, have demonstrated experience and expertise with home visiting and the types of family-strengthening services that meet the purpose of the grant program. The duties of an implementation partner may be established by department rule and may vary based on the purpose of a particular grant program, but must, at a minimum, include:

Assisting the department in reviewing applications and selecting grantees; and

Working with applicants to complete a community readiness assessment when needed.

This part 9 does not apply to nor affect implementation of the "Colorado Nurse Home Visitor Program Act", part 5 of this article 3.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 658, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-3-904. Home visiting grant program - authorized requirements - implementation partner - rules - definition - repeal.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate to the department one million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 for purposes of implementing the home visiting grant program. For the purposes of this section, "home visiting" means a voluntary, evidence-based, two-generation, and home-based prevention program for families with children from prenatal to six years of age. The home visiting grant program must support school readiness, social-emotional growth, and age-appropriate child development and be delivered by a trained home visitor. The home visiting grant program must be prioritized to expand access to populations that are underserved by language, culture, or geography.

Money spent pursuant to this subsection (1) must conform with the allowable purposes set forth in the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as amended. The department shall either spend or obligate such appropriation prior to December 30, 2024, and expend the appropriation on or before December 31, 2026.

The department shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-213), ch. 345, p. 2468, § 7, effective July 1.